Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1902
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 48-1901 to 48-1910, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Alcohol means any product of distillation
of any fermented liquid, whether rectified or diluted, whatever may be the
origin thereof, synthetic ethyl alcohol, the four varieties of liquor, alcohol,
spirits, wine, and beer, as
defined in sections 53-103.01, 53-103.03, 53-103.38, and 53-103.42, every
liquid or solid, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine, or beer,
and alcohol used in the manufacture of denatured alcohol, flavoring extracts,
syrups, or medicinal, mechanical, scientific, culinary, and toilet preparations;

(2) Breath-testing device means intoxilyzer
model 4011AS or other scientific testing equivalent as approved by and operated
in accordance with the department rules and regulations;

(3) Breath-testing-device operator means a
person who has obtained or been issued a permit pursuant to the department
rules and regulations;

(4) Department means the
Department of Health and Human Services;

(5) Department rules and regulations means the
techniques and methods authorized pursuant to section 60-6,201;

(6) Drug means any substance, chemical,
or compound as described, defined, or delineated in sections 28-405 and 28-419
or any metabolite or conjugated form thereof, except that any substance, chemical,
or compound containing any product as defined in subdivision (1) of this section
may also be defined as alcohol;

(7) Employee means any person who receives
any remuneration, commission, bonus, or other form of wages in return for
such person's actions which directly or indirectly benefit an employer; and

(8) Employer means the State of Nebraska
and its political subdivisions, all other governmental entities, or any individual,
association, corporation, or other organization doing business in the State
of Nebraska unless it, he, or she employs a total of less than six full-time
and part-time employees at any one time.

Laws 1988, LB 582, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 44;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 276;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 218;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 6.